Alabama, session 2026rs, SB341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
17 Section 1. Sections 1 through 19 of this act shall be
18 known and may be cited as the Alabama Work Zone Safety Act.
19 Section 2. The Legislature finds and declares the
20 following:
21 (1) Highway construction and maintenance creates a high
22 risk environment for highway workers who must work alongside
23 motor vehicles traveling at high rates of speed.
24 (2) Numerous highway workers have been struck and
25 killed in work zones due to motor vehicles traveling at high
26 rates of speed through the work zones.
27 (3) Speed enforcement management within a work zone is
28 one of the most effective measures to improve safety in the
Page 1

one of the most effective measures to improve safety in the
SB341 Enrolled
29 work zone.
30 (4) Speed enforcement is highly labor intensive and can
31 even be hazardous to law enforcement officers given the
32 physical constraints of many work zones.
33 (5) Photographic speed enforcement systems allow law
34 enforcement to successfully manage speed enforcement in a work
35 zone in a safe and cost-effective manner.
36 (6) The adoption and implementation of a photographic
37 speed enforcement system for work zones is necessary to reduce
38 severe crashes, reduce speeding, and improve safe traffic flow
39 in work zones in a state where the patrol resources alone are
40 not capable of consistent enforcement of traffic laws at a
41 level necessary to protect human life.
42 (7) The severe lack of safety of highway workers in
43 work zones is an emergency that necessitates the immediate
44 adoption of a photographic speed enforcement system consistent
45 with the terms of this act.
46 Section 3. (a) The Alabama Work Zone Safety Act is
47 enacted as a pilot program and shall continue through the
48 completion of all work done in the work zone designated by the
49 Department of Transportation, unless continued by act of the
50 Legislature.
51 (b) The Department of Transportation and the Alabama
52 State Law Enforcement Agency (ALEA) shall collaborate to
53 implement the pilot program for one work zone conducted on the
54 interstate and shall finalize a plan for the implementation of
55 the pilot program by October 1, 2026. The plan shall
56 contemplate a gradual rollout of the program and the promotion
Page 2

contemplate a gradual rollout of the program and the promotion
SB341 Enrolled
57 of driver awareness of the pending use of the program in work
58 zones. The plan shall ensure that the full scale
59 implementation and enforcement of the program shall not occur
60 sooner than November 16, 2026, to ensure that the
61 implementation of the program is phased in. To satisfy this
62 deadline, the department and ALEA may make necessary emergency
63 procurements pursuant to Sections 39-2-2 and 41-16-53, Code of
64 Alabama 1975, and may adopt emergency rules pursuant to
65 Section 41-22-5, Code of Alabama 1975, to govern the use of
66 devices in work zones; ensure adequate notice for drivers, and
67 signage rules, clear protocol for installation and placement
68 of enforcement tools; provide for the use of speed detection
69 to aid traffic law enforcement; and maintain statistical data
70 to measure the effectiveness of tools on driver behavior.
71 (c) Not later than March 1, 2027, the Department of
72 Transportation and the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency
73 shall prepare an interim report to the Legislature summarizing
74 the implementation of this pilot program and shall provide
75 data measuring the effectiveness of the pilot program on
76 creating safer work zones.
77 Section 4. As used in Sections 1 through 19 of this
78 act, the following terms have the following meanings:
79 (1) ALEA. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency.
80 (2) AUTHORITY. The Alabama Toll Road, Bridge, and
81 Tunnel Authority.
82 (3) AUTOMATED PHOTOGRAPHIC SPEED ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM. A
83 photographic speed enforcement system that is capable of
84 automatically recording digital images and speed of motor
Page 3

automatically recording digital images and speed of motor
SB341 Enrolled
85 vehicles.
86 (4) CIVIL TRAFFIC CITATION. A non-criminal citation
87 created pursuant to this act, the penalty for which is a civil
88 fine, and the enforceability of which is accomplished through
89 civil action.
90 (5) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of
91 Transportation.
92 (6) OWNER. The owner of a motor vehicle as shown on the
93 motor vehicle registration records of the Alabama Department
94 of Revenue or the analogous department or agency of another
95 state or country, except as follows:
96 a. The term does not include a motor vehicle rental or
97 leasing company when a motor vehicle registered by the company
98 is rented or leased to another person under a rental or lease
99 agreement with the company, in which event "owner" means the
100 person to whom the vehicle is rented or leased.
101 b. The term does not include any motor vehicle
102 displaying a plate that indicates the motor vehicle is being
103 operated by an individual other than the owner of the motor
104 vehicle, including a dealer license plate, fleet plate, U.S.
105 military plate, utility plate, government plate, federal
106 plate, or commercial motor vehicle plate, in which event
107 "owner" means the person to whom the vehicle is assigned for
108 use.
109 (7) SPEEDING VIOLATION. Any violation of a motor
110 vehicle at a speed that exceeds 10 miles per hour over the
111 posted speed limit.
112 (8) WORK ZONE. A segment of a state, U.S., or
Page 4

(8) WORK ZONE. A segment of a state, U.S., or
SB341 Enrolled
113 interstate highway designated by the department or the
114 authority where construction, maintenance, inspection,
115 surveying, or utility work is actively occurring and where
116 workers are present, and where official work zone signage is
117 posted.
118 Section 5. (a) The department and authority may install
119 automated photographic speed enforcement systems to monitor
120 motor vehicle activity in a work zone.
121 (b) The automated photographic speed enforcement system
122 shall be: (i) a photographic, radar, lidar, laser, or other
123 device; (ii) designed to automatically detect the speed of
124 moving motor vehicles; (iii) designed to automatically record
125 digital imaging of a motor vehicle and an image of the rear
126 license plate of a motor vehicle engaged in a speeding
127 violation; and (iv) designed to automatically record the speed
128 of a motor vehicle engaged in a speeding violation.
129 (c) The department, authority, or a third party
130 approved by the department or authority may place automated
131 photographic speed enforcement systems at work zones as
132 necessary to assure the safety of the work zone. The
133 department may adopt rules, including emergency rules, to
134 implement this section and to provide for the approval of
135 third parties under this section.
136 Section 6. (a) ALEA may use a manually operated
137 photographic speed enforcement system to monitor motor vehicle
138 activity in a work zone as necessary to assure the safety of
139 the work zone. The system shall be operated by a law
140 enforcement officer in a manner that combines a manually
Page 5

enforcement officer in a manner that combines a manually
SB341 Enrolled
141 operated camera system that works in conjunction with an
142 electronically operated speed detection system to record
143 digital imaging of a motor vehicle that is speeding.
144 (b) The Secretary of ALEA may adopt rules, including
145 emergency rules, to implement this section and to establish
146 uniform procedures for law enforcement officers operating
147 under this act.
148 Section 7. A photographic speed enforcement system
149 authorized under this act may be used to detect and record
150 motor vehicle speeding violations in an active work zone. For
151 purposes of this act, "active work zone" means a work zone
152 that satisfies all of the following conditions:
153 (1) The area is designated by the department or
154 authority as a work zone.
155 (2) Employees or contractors of the department or
156 authority or construction, maintenance, inspection, surveying,
157 utility, or other workers are present.
158 (3) Work zone traffic control devices, traffic
159 controls, or warning signs are present to notify motorists and
160 pedestrians of construction, maintenance, inspection,
161 surveying, utility, or other workers in the area.
162 (4) Not less than two warning signs are placed at least
163 500 feet in advance of the entrance warning motorists that a
164 photographic speed enforcement system is being operated in the
165 area and that a violation will result in a fine.
166 Section 8. (a) When a motor vehicle is recorded
167 operating in an active work zone at a speed that exceeds 10
168 miles per hour over the posted speed limit, ALEA may issue a
Page 6

miles per hour over the posted speed limit, ALEA may issue a
SB341 Enrolled
169 civil traffic citation to the registered owner of the motor
170 vehicle.
171 (b) When a speeding violation is recorded, ALEA shall
172 send to the owner of the motor vehicle, via mail, a notice of
173 the civil traffic citation which was recorded by the automated
174 photographic speed enforcement system while committing a
175 speeding violation. The notice shall be sent not later than 30
176 days after the date the speeding violation is recorded, as
177 follows:
178 (1) If the vehicle is registered in this state, to the
179 registered owner's address as shown on the registration
180 records of the Department of Revenue.
181 (2) If the vehicle is registered in another state or
182 country, to the registered owner's address as shown on the
183 motor vehicle registration records of the other state or
184 country.
185 (c) The notice shall contain all of the following:
186 (1) A description of the violation alleged, including
187 the speed at which the motor vehicle is alleged to have been
188 operated, and the maximum speed applicable at the location.
189 (2) The date, time, and location of the speeding
190 violation.
191 (3) A copy of recorded images of the vehicle involved
192 in the speeding violation.
193 (4) The amount of the civil penalty to be imposed for
194 the speeding violation.
195 (5) The date by which the civil penalty must be paid.
196 For purposes of this subdivision, the Alabama State Law
Page 7

For purposes of this subdivision, the Alabama State Law
SB341 Enrolled
197 Enforcement Agency shall require the civil penalty to be paid
198 by a date certain, not less than 60 days following issuance of
199 the notice of violation.
200 (6) A statement that the person named in the notice of
201 violation may pay the civil penalty in lieu of appearing at an
202 administrative adjudication hearing.
203 (7) A statement that the person has the right to
204 contest the imposition of the civil penalty in an
205 administrative adjudication and information about the manner
206 and time in which the person may contest the imposition of the
207 civil penalty.
208 (8) A statement that failure to pay the civil penalty
209 or to contest liability is an admission of liability.
210 (9) A statement that a recorded image is evidence in a
211 proceeding for the imposition of a civil penalty.
212 (10) Any other information necessary for issuing the
213 notice.
214 (11) A statement that if the registered owner is a
215 rental car company, the company has the right to provide
216 information to ALEA on which individual was renting the
217 vehicle at the time of violation. The statement shall include
218 information about how to provide the information of the
219 individual.
220 (d) In lieu of issuing a notice of violation, ALEA may
221 mail a warning notice to the registered owner. ALEA shall
222 exercise discretion in issuing the warning notice.
223 (e) In the event the evidence produced by a
224 photographic speed enforcement system does not produce an
Page 8

photographic speed enforcement system does not produce an
SB341 Enrolled
225 image of the license plate with sufficient clarity for a speed
226 enforcement system operator to determine the identity of the
227 owner, and if the identity cannot otherwise be reliably
228 established, then no notice of speeding violation may be
229 issued pursuant to this act.
230 Section 9. Failure to pay a civil penalty or to contest
231 liability in a timely manner is an admission of liability in
232 the full amount of the civil fine assessed in the notice of
233 violation.
234 Section 10. (a) The Secretary of ALEA shall adopt rules
235 providing for a hearing procedure and the administrative
236 resolution of speeding violations under this act. The rules
237 shall provide for the hearing to be conducted by a driver
238 license hearing officer or other hearing officer appointed by
239 the secretary. The hearing may be informal. The hearing shall
240 not be a contested case under the Alabama Administrative
241 Procedure Act. Following the hearing, the hearing officer
242 shall issue a final order.
243 (b)(1) Speeding violations under this act shall be
244 punished by a civil fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250),
245 which shall be collected as other civil judgments are
246 collected. Court costs shall not be assessed except as
247 provided in subsection (c).
248 (2) In no event shall a speeding violation be
249 punishable by a criminal fine or imprisonment.
250 (3) The Secretary of ALEA shall not assess any points
251 against a driver license or suspend or revoke a driver license
252 for a speeding violation.
Page 9

for a speeding violation.
SB341 Enrolled
253 (c) A person who is found liable for a speeding
254 violation after an adjudicative hearing or who requests an
255 adjudicative hearing and thereafter fails to appear at the
256 time and place of the hearing is liable for court costs and
257 fees set in addition to the amount of the civil penalty
258 assessed for the speeding violation. A person who is found
259 liable for a speeding violation after an adjudicative hearing
260 shall pay the civil penalty and costs withing 60 days of the
261 hearing.
262 (d) Whenever a person is ordered to pay a civil penalty
263 under this act, the amount of the civil penalty as set by this
264 act may not be increased, decreased, or remitted by the court,
265 and the liability may be satisfied only by payment in full.
266 (e) An order issued under this section shall have the
267 same weight and effect as any other civil judgment.
268 Section 11. (a) Any agency using a photographic speed
269 enforcement system shall ensure the system is calibrated on an
270 annual basis by an independent calibration laboratory.
271 (b) The independent calibration laboratory performing
272 the calibration shall issue a certificate of calibration for
273 the automated photographic speed enforcement system as proof
274 of both of the following:
275 (1) The annual calibration check was performed.
276 (2) The automated photographic speed enforcement system
277 is accurately calibrated.
278 Section 12. (a) For purposes of this act, a "speed
279 enforcement system operator" means any of the following
280 individuals who are trained and certified to operate a
Page 10

individuals who are trained and certified to operate a
SB341 Enrolled
281 photographic speed enforcement system:
282 (1) An employee of ALEA or a county or municipal law
283 enforcement agency.
284 (2) An employee of the department or authority.
285 (3) A third party approved by the department or
286 authority to operate or install a photographic speed
287 enforcement system.
288 (b) An individual may be trained and certified to
289 operate a photographic speed enforcement system as described
290 in subsection (a) by completing training by the manufacturer
291 or vendor of the system in the following:
292 (1) Certification of automated speed enforcement
293 systems and accuracy testing.
294 (2) Image quality requirements.
295 (3) Chain of custody procedures.
296 (4) Technician training and discretion for determining
297 which violations to process.
298 (5) Vendor performance and auditing requirements.
299 (6) Requirements for issuance, service, and processing
300 of notices of violation.
301 (7) Any other requirement adopted by rule of the
302 department.
303 (c) The manufacturer or vendor of a photographic speed
304 enforcement system shall issue a certificate of training to an
305 individual who successfully completes the training required
306 under subsection (b).
307 Section 13. (a) The reliability of a photographic speed
308 enforcement system used to produce the recorded image of the
Page 11

enforcement system used to produce the recorded image of the
SB341 Enrolled
309 speeding violation may be attested to by affidavit of a speed
310 enforcement system operator.
311 (b) An affidavit of a speed enforcement system operator
312 that alleges a violation based on an inspection of the
313 pertinent recorded image shall be admissible in a proceeding
314 under this act as evidence of the facts contained in the
315 affidavit.
316 (c) The notice of violation; the recorded and
317 reproduced images of the speeding violation, regardless of the
318 media on which they are recorded, accompanied by a
319 certification of authenticity of a speed enforcement system
320 operator; and evidence of ownership of a vehicle as shown by
321 copies or summaries of official records, shall be admissible
322 into evidence without foundation unless the court finds there
323 is an indication of untrustworthiness, in which case the
324 prosecution shall be given a reasonable opportunity to lay an
325 evidentiary foundation.
326 (d) The issue of whether an image of a license plate is
327 sufficiently clear to identify the vehicle is admissible as to
328 the weight of the evidence.
329 Section 14. (a) The owner of a motor vehicle may raise
330 any of the following as an affirmative defense to the
331 imposition of liability under this act:
332 (1) The operator of the motor vehicle was acting in
333 compliance with the lawful order or direction of a law
334 enforcement officer.
335 (2) The motor vehicle was being operated as an
336 authorized emergency vehicle.
Page 12

authorized emergency vehicle.
SB341 Enrolled
337 (3) The motor vehicle was stolen or being operated by a
338 person other than the owner of the vehicle without the
339 effective consent of the owner.
340 (4) The license plate depicted in the recorded image of
341 the speeding violation was a stolen license plate and being
342 displayed on a motor vehicle other than the motor vehicle for
343 which the license plate had been issued.
344 (5) The person who received the notice of civil traffic
345 citation was not the owner of the motor vehicle at the time of
346 the speeding violation.
347 (6) The person who received the notice of civil traffic
348 citation was not the operator of the motor vehicle at the time
349 of the speeding violation.
350 (7) The operator of the vehicle was arrested or was
351 issued a citation and notice to appear by a law enforcement
352 officer for a traffic or criminal violation of any other
353 portion of Title 32, Code of Alabama 1975, or any other
354 municipal ordinance that embraces and incorporates the
355 statutes contained in that title, and the conduct resulting in
356 the citation occurred simultaneously with and under the same
357 set of circumstances recorded by the automated photographic
358 speed enforcement system.
359 (b) The burden of raising and establishing the
360 affirmative defense shall be on the owner of the vehicle.
361 Section 15. A final order issued under Section 10 may
362 be reviewed by the circuit court by the filing of a notice of
363 appeal pursuant to Section 41-22-20, Code of Alabama 1975,
364 within 30 days after the final order is issued. The filing of
Page 13

within 30 days after the final order is issued. The filing of
SB341 Enrolled
365 the notice of appeal shall stay enforcement of the civil
366 penalty.
367 Section 16. The department or authority, or its
368 contractor, shall place traffic control devices in conformity
369 with a nationally recognized traffic engineering handbook,
370 including, but not limited to, the Manual of Uniform Traffic
371 Control Devices and the traffic control plans of the
372 department. There is a presumption that the department's
373 actions are in compliance with this section unless the
374 contrary is shown by a preponderance of the evidence.
375 Section 17. The department or authority may perform the
376 duties assigned to the department or authority under this act
377 either directly or through a contracted manufacturer or vendor
378 selected pursuant to state the procurement process and
379 operating in coordination with the department or authority.
380 Any procurements made under this act shall not be considered
381 to be a contract for professional services. The department or
382 authority shall follow the department or authority's
383 procurement procedures. The department or authority shall have
384 sole discretion on selecting a vendor or vendors.
385 Section 18. ALEA may procure the equipment and
386 technology necessary to operate a photographic speed
387 enforcement system pursuant to the state procurement law. The
388 procurement shall not be considered a contract for
389 professional services. The system may be operated using
390 manual, handheld, or unmanned devices capable of being mounted
391 to a vehicle. ALEA shall have sole discretion on selecting a
392 vendor or vendors.
Page 14

vendor or vendors.
SB341 Enrolled
393 Section 19. All civil penalties collected under this
394 act shall be distributed as follows:
395 (1) Fifty percent to ALEA, to be used solely for costs
396 relating to the implementation of this act, with the remaining
397 proceeds deposited into the ALEA Work Zone Safety Fund.
398 (2) Fifty percent to the department, to be used solely
399 for costs relating to the implementation of this act, with the
400 remaining proceeds deposited into the Transportation Work Zone
401 Safety Fund.
402 Section 20. The ALEA Work Zone Safety Fund is created
403 in the State Treasury to be administered by ALEA. Funds shall
404 be budgeted and allotted pursuant to Chapter 19 of Title 41,
405 Code of Alabama 1975.
406 Section 21. The Transportation Work Zone Safety Fund is
407 created in the State Treasury to be administered by the
408 department. Funds shall be budgeted and allotted pursuant to
409 Chapter 19 of Title 41, Code of Alabama 1975.
410 Section 22. Sections 1 through 19 of this act are
411 repealed September 30, 2028.
412 Section 23. This act shall become effective
413 immediately.
Page 15

immediately.
SB341 Enrolled
414
415
416
417
418
419
420 ________________________________________________
421 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
422
423
424
425 ________________________________________________
426 Speaker of the House of Representatives
427
428
429 SB341
430 Senate 17-Mar-26
431 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
432 the Senate, as amended.
433
434 Senate 09-Apr-26
435 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
436 the Senate, as amended by Conference Committee Report.
437
438 Patrick Harris,
439 Secretary.
440
441
442
443
444 House of Representatives
445 Passed: 07-Apr-26, as amended.
446
447 House of Representatives
448 Passed: 09-Apr-26, as amended by Conference Committee Report.
449
450
451
452
453 By: Senator Carnley
Page 16